src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_puuvsah_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - puuvsah:
    puuvsah+N+Pl+Nom: puuvsah
    puuvsah+N+Pl+Gen: [puuvsâi, puvsâi]
    puuvsah+N+Pl+Acc: puuvsâid
#    puuvsah+N+Pl+Ill: puvssáid
    puuvsah+N+Pl+Loc: puuvsâin
    puuvsah+N+Pl+Com: [puvsâiguin, puvsâigijn]
    puuvsah+N+Pl+Abe: puvsâittáá
